Maryland, session 2025, SB0803.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
20–426.
(a) Except in [Talbot County or] Wicomico County, if a hotel fails to pay the hotel
rental tax to a county within 1 month after the payment is due under § 20–410 of this
subtitle, the hotel shall pay a tax penalty of 10% of the unpaid tax.
(b) If a hotel fails to pay the hotel rental tax to [Talbot County or] Wicomico
County within 120 days after the payment is due under § 20–410 of this subtitle, the hotel
shall pay a tax penalty of 10% of the unpaid tax.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0803*